Tennessee, session 114, SB1166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 6, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall provide a report to the speakers
of the senate and the house of representatives on or before January 1, 2026, and each
January 1 thereafter, detailing the instances in the most recent year for which complete
data is available in which a person who was arrested for driving under the influence
under § 55-10-401 but where no alcohol or other intoxicants are detected in the person's
blood or breath.
(b) The report required under subsection (a) must include the law enforcement
agency that made the arrest.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1166
002786
- 1 -